test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-mato_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

 Verb - mâto - ok : # Ordinary IA verb - full paradigm
  mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nimâton
  mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kimâton
  mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mâtow
  mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+4Sg: mâtoyiwa
  mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nimâtonân
  mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kimâtonaw, kimâtonânaw]
  mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kimâtonâwâw
  mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mâtowak
  mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prs+4Pl: mâtoyiwa

  mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikîmâton, nikî-mâton]
  mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikîmâton, kikî-mâton]
  mâto+V+IA+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kîmâtow, kî-mâtow]

  mâto+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-mâtoyân, êmâtoyân]
  mâto+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-mâtoyan, êmâtoyan]
  mâto+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mâtot, êmâtot]
  mâto+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [ê-mâtoyit, êmâtoyit]
  mâto+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-mâtoyâhk, êmâtoyâhk]
  mâto+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-mâtoyahk, êmâtoyahk]
  mâto+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-mâtoyêk, êmâtoyêk]
  mâto+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mâtocik, êmâtocik]
  mâto+V+IA+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [ê-mâtoyit, êmâtoyit]

  mâto+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mâto
  mâto+V+IA+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mâtok
  mâto+V+IA+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mâtotân

  mâto+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Sg: mâtohkan
  mâto+V+IA+Imp+Del+2Pl: mâtohkêk
  mâto+V+IA+Imp+Del+12Pl: mâtohkahk
